test/src/morphology/V-salvata_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - salvata: # Verb 'to close / sulkea, salvata' - full paradigm
     salvata+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: salbuan
     salvata+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: salbuat
     salvata+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: salbuau
     salvata+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: salbuammo
     salvata+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: salbuatto
     salvata+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: salvatah
     salvata+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: salbua
                  
     salvata+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: salbain
     salvata+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: salbait
     salvata+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: salbai
     salvata+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: salbaimmo
     salvata+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: salbaitto
     salvata+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: salvattih
     salvata+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: salvannuh
     salvata+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+ScPl3: salvattu
